Utah statutes.
17-36-20.1.   Purchases or encumbrances by purchasing agent.

(1)  This section does not apply to a county of the first class.

(2)  All purchases or all encumbrances on behalf of any county shall be made or incurred only upon an order or approval of the person duly authorized to act as purchasing agent for the county, except encumbrances or expenditures directly investigated and reported by the county auditor and approved by the governing body.  Unless otherwise provided by the governing body, the budget officer or such officer's agent shall serve as purchasing agent.



Enacted by Chapter 17, 2012 General Session

